test/src/morphology/V-yshtash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


#    Verb - ӹштӓш: # Verb-em 'do; try out'
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ӹштем
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ӹштет
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ӹштӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ӹштенӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ӹштедӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ӹштӓт
     
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#    
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: ӹштӹшӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: ӹштӹшӹц
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: ӹштӹш
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: ӹштӹшнӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: ӹштӹшдӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: ӹштевӹ
     
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: ӹштеп
#
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: ӹштенӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: ӹштенӓт
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: ӹштен
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: ӹштеннӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: ӹштендӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: ӹштенӹт
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: ӹштӹделам
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: ӹштӹделат
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: ӹштӹде 
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: ӹштӹделна
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: ӹштӹделда
     ӹштӓш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: ӹштӹделыт
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: ӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Sg3: ӹштӹжӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: ӹштӹдӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Imprt+Pl3: ӹштӹштӹ
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: ӹштемӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: ӹштемӓдӓ
##   
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg1: ӹштӹнем
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg3: ӹштӹнет
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Sg3: ӹштӹнежӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl1: ӹштӹненӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнедӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнештӹ


##
     ӹштӓш+V+Inf: ӹштӓш
     ӹштӓш+V+Des+Pl3: ӹштӹнештӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct: ӹштӹшӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹшӹ

     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹшӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹшӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Com: ӹштӹшӹге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹшӹлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹшӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Ill: ӹштӹшӹшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Lat: ӹштӹшеш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹшӹлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹшӹде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹшӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹшӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹшӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Com: ӹштӹшӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹшӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹшӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹшӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹшӹвлӓде

     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹшем 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹшемӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹшемӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Com: ӹштӹшемге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹшемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ӹштӹшешем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹшемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹлӓэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹшемде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹшемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹшемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹшемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Com: ӹштӹшемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Com: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹшемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹшемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: ӹштӹшемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹшемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹшемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹшӹвлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: ӹштӹшӹвлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcAct+Der/ЫшЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹшемвлӓде

##   
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹмӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹмӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹмӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Com: ӹштӹмӹге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹмӹлан
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹмӹшты
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Ill: ӹштӹмӹшкы
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Lat: ӹштӹмеш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹмӹла
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹмӹде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹмӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹмӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹмӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Com: ӹштӹмӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹмӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹмӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹмӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹмӹвлӓде
 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹмем 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹмемӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹмемӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Com: ӹштӹмемге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹмемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: колтымешем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹмемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹлаэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹмемде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹмемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹмемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹмемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Com: ӹштӹмемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Com: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹмемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹмемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: ӹштӹмемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹмемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹмемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹмӹвлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: ӹштӹмӹвлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcPss+Der/ЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹмемвлӓде
## 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Com: ӹштӹдӹмӹге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Ine: ӹштӹдӹмӹштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Ill: ӹштӹдӹмӹшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Lat: ӹштӹдӹмеш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмӹде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Com: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Ill: [ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓшкӹ, ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓш]
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓде
 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмем 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмемӹн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмемӹм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Com: ӹштӹдӹмемге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмемлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмешем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Comp: ӹштӹдӹмемлӓ 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹлӓэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹдеэм 
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Sg+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмемде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Nom: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Gen: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Acc: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Com: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Com: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмге
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэмлӓн
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓлӓнем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓштем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ine: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓштӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Ill: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓшкӹ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓшкем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Lat: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓэш
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмӹвлӓэшем
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Comp: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+Comp+PxSg1: ӹштӹдӹмывлӓлӓэм
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: ӹштӹдӹмывлӓэмлӓ
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмывлӓэмде
     ӹштӓш+V+PrcNeg+Der/ЫдЫмЫ+PxSg1+Pl+Abe: ӹштӹдӹмемвлӓде
